Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle C. Private Trust Company.

§ 81-27-4.301.
Private trust company.

A private trust company engaging in the trust business in this state shall comply with each and every provision of this chapter applicable to a trust company unless expressly exempted therefrom in writing by the commissioner pursuant to this section, by rule or regulation adopted by the commissioner or under a predecessor statute.

A private trust company or proposed private trust company may request in writing that it be exempted from specified provisions of Sections 81-27-2.105(b), 81-27-4.102(k), 81-27-4.104(a), 81-27-4.106(a), 81-27-5.002, 81-27-5.101(b), (c) and (d), 81-27-5.105 and 81-27-5.201. The commissioner may grant the exemption in whole or in part if the commissioner finds that the private trust company does not and will not transact business with the general public. For purposes of this section:

“Transact business with the general public” means any sales, solicitations, arrangements, agreements, or transactions to provide trust or other business services, whether or not for a fee, commission, or any other type of remuneration, with any client that is not a family member or a sole proprietorship, partnership, joint venture, association, trust, estate, business trust, or other company that is not one hundred percent (100%) owned by one or more family members;

“Family member” means any individual who is related within the fourth degree of affinity or consanguinity to an individual or individuals who control a private trust company or which is controlled by one or more trusts or charitable organizations established by such individual or individuals; and

All individuals who control a private trust company or establish trusts or charitable organizations controlling such private trust company must be related within the second degree of affinity or consanguinity.

At the expense of the private trust company, the commissioner may examine or investigate the private trust company in connection with an application for exemption. Unless the application presents novel or unusual questions, the commissioner shall approve the application for exemption or set the application for hearing not later than the sixty-first day after the date the commissioner considers the application complete and accepted for filing. The commissioner may require the submission of additional information as considered necessary to an informed decision.

Any exemption granted under this section may be made subject to conditions or limitations imposed by the commissioner consistent with this chapter.

The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations defining other circumstances that do not constitute transaction of business with the public, specifying the provisions of this chapter that are subject to an exemption request, and establishing procedures and requirements for obtaining, maintaining, or revoking exempt status.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-4.302.
Requirements to apply for and maintain status as a private trust company.

Application.

A private trust company requesting an exemption from the provisions of this chapter pursuant to Section 81-27-4.301 shall file an application with the commissioner containing the following:

The commissioner shall not approve a private trust company exemption unless the application is completed as required in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

The exempt private trust company withholds requested information from the commissioner; or

The exempt private trust company violates any provision of this section applicable to exempt private trust companies.

A nonrefundable application fee as set by the commissioner;

A detailed statement under oath showing the private trust company’s assets and liabilities as of the end of the month previous to the filing of the application;

A statement under oath of the reason for requesting the exemption;

A statement under oath that the private trust company is not currently transacting business with the public and that the company will not conduct business with the public without the prior written permission of the commissioner;

The current street mailing address and telephone number of the physical location in this state at which the private trust company will maintain its books and records, together with a statement under oath that the address given is true and correct and is not a United States Postal Service post office box or a private mail box, postal box, or mail drop; and

Listing of the specific provisions of the chapter for which the request for exemption is made.

Requirements.

To maintain status as an exempt private trust company under this chapter, the private trust company shall comply with the following:

An exempt private trust company shall not transact business with the public.

An exempt private trust company shall file an annual certification that it is maintaining the conditions and limitations of its exempt status. This annual certification shall be filed on a form provided by the commissioner and be accompanied by a fee determined by the commissioner. The annual certification shall be filed on or before June 30 of each year. No annual certification shall be valid unless it bears an acknowledgment stamped by the department. The department shall have thirty (30) days from the date of receipt to return a copy of the acknowledged annual certification to the private trust company. The burden shall be on the exempt private trust company to notify the department of any failure to return an acknowledged copy of any annual certification within the thirty-day period. The commissioner may examine or investigate the private state trust company periodically as necessary to verify the certification.

An exempt private trust company shall comply with the principal office provisions of Section 81-27-2.003 and with the address and telephone requirements of subsection (a)(1)(E) of this section.

The exempt private trust company shall pay the corporation franchise tax under Section 27-13-1 et seq.

Change of control. Control of an exempt private trust company may not be transferred or sold with exempt status. In any change of control, the acquiring control person must comply with the provisions of this chapter and the exempt status of the private trust company shall automatically terminate upon the effective date of the transfer. A separate application for exempt status must be filed if the acquiring person wishes to obtain or continue an exemption pursuant to this section.

Authority to revoke. The commissioner shall have authority to revoke the exempt status of a private trust company in the following circumstances:

The exempt private trust company makes a false statement under oath on any document required to be filed by the chapter or by any rule or regulation promulgated by the commissioner; or

The exempt private trust company fails to submit to an examination as required by Section 81-27-2.003; or

Notification of revocation of exemption. If the commissioner determines from examination or other credible evidence that an exempt private trust company has violated any of the requirements of this section, the commissioner may by personal delivery or registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, notify the exempt private trust company in writing that the private trust company’s exempt status has been revoked. The notification must state grounds for the revocation with reasonable certainty. The notice must state its effective date, which may not be before the fifth day after the date the notification is mailed or delivered. The revocation takes effect for the private trust company if the private trust company does not request a hearing in writing before the effective date. After taking effect the revocation is final and nonappealable as to that private trust company, and the private trust company shall be subject to all of the requirements and provisions of the act applicable to nonexempt state trust companies.

Compliance period. A private trust company shall have five (5) calendar days after the revocation is effective to comply with the provisions of this chapter from which it was formerly exempt. If, however, the commissioner determines, at the time of revocation, that the private trust company has been engaging in or attempting to engage in acts intended or designed to deceive or defraud the public, the commissioner may shorten or eliminate, in the commissioner’s sole discretion, the five (5) calendar days compliance period.

Remedies for failure to comply. If the private trust company does not comply with all of the provisions of this chapter, including such capitalization requirements as have been determined by the commissioner as necessary to assure the safety and soundness of the private trust company, within the prescribed time period, the commissioner may:

Institute any action or remedy prescribed by this chapter, or any applicable rule or regulation, or

Refer the private trust company to the Attorney General for institution of a quo warranto proceeding to revoke the charter.

Private trust company under prior law. A private trust company that currently has a valid exemption under a predecessor statute is considered exempt under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-4.303.
Conversion to public trust company.

A private trust company may terminate its status as a private trust company and commence transacting business with the general public. A private trust company desiring to commence transacting business with the general public shall file a notice on a form prescribed by the commissioner, which shall set forth the name of the private trust company and an acknowledgement that any exemption granted or otherwise applicable to the private trust company pursuant to Section 81-27-4.301 shall cease to apply on the effective date of such notice, furnish a copy of the resolution adopted by the board authorizing the private trust company to commence transacting business with the general public, and pay the filing fee, if any, prescribed by the commissioner.

The notificant may commence transacting business with the general public on the thirty-first day after the date the commissioner receives the notice, unless the commissioner specifies an earlier or later date.

The thirty-day period of review may be extended by the commissioner on determination that the written notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis. If the period for review is extended, the notificant may commence transacting business with the public only on prior written approval by the commissioner.

The commissioner may deny approval of the notice of the private trust company to commence transacting business with the general public if the commissioner finds that the notificant lacks sufficient financial resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness or that the proposed transacting of business of the general public would be contrary to the public interest or if the commissioner determines that the notificant will not within a reasonable period be in compliance with any provision of this chapter from which the notificant had been previously exempted pursuant to Section 81-27-4.301.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.